Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF774.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin BENTON COUNTY; COUNTY STATE-AID HIGHWAY 1 IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $21,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to Benton County to design, engineer, construct, and reconstruct improvements and betterments of a capital nature along County State-Aid Highway 1 (Mayhew Lake Road) between 14th Avenue and 35th Street in the city of Sauk Rapids. This appropriation includes money for construction and reconstruction of six roundabouts and construction and reconstruction of County State-Aid Highway 1. This appropriation does not require a nonstate contribution. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $21,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end